Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 1
CONSIGNMENT OF WORKS OF FINE ART

6-15-101. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Art dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling works of fine art, other than a person exclusively engaged in the business of selling goods at public auction.

"Artist" means the creator of a work of fine art.

"On consignment" means that no title to or estate in the goods or right to possession thereof superior to that of the consignor vests in the consignee, notwithstanding the consignee's power or authority to transfer and convey all of the right, title, and interest of the consignor, in and to such goods to a third person.

"Work of fine art" or "work" means:

A work of visual art such as a painting, sculpture, drawing, mosaic, or photograph;

A work of calligraphy;

A work of graphic art such as an etching, a lithograph, an offset print, a silk screen, or any other work of similar nature;

A craft work in materials, including but not limited to clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, or glass;

A work in mixed media such as collage or any combination of the art media set forth in this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 229, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2017:

IP amended, (HB 17-1241), ch. 163, p. 605, § 2, effective August 9.

6-15-102. Art dealers and artists - consignment of works of fine art.

Notwithstanding any custom, practice, or usage of the trade and any of the provisions of section 4-2-326, C.R.S., to the contrary, whenever an artist delivers or causes to be delivered a work of fine art of his own creation to an art dealer for the purpose of exhibition or sale on a commission, fee, or other basis of compensation, the delivery to and acceptance thereof by the art dealer is deemed to place the work on consignment and:

Such art dealer shall thereafter, with respect to the work, be deemed to be the agent of such artist;

Such work is trust property in the hands of the consignee for the benefit of the consignor; and

Any proceeds from the sale of the work are trust funds in the hands of the consignee for the benefit of the consignor.

Notwithstanding the subsequent purchase of a work of fine art by the consignee directly or indirectly for his own account, the work initially received on consignment shall be deemed to remain trust property until the price is paid in full to the consignor. If such work is thereafter resold to a bona fide third party before the consignor has been paid in full, the proceeds of the resale are trust funds in the hands of the consignee for the benefit of the consignor to the extent necessary to pay any balance still due to the consignor, and such trusteeship shall continue until the fiduciary obligation of the consignee with respect to such transaction is discharged in full.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Uniform Commercial Code - Sales", no such trust property or trust funds shall be subject to or subordinate to any claims, liens, or security interests of the consignee's creditors.

An art dealer is strictly liable for the loss of or damage to a work of fine art while it is in his possession. The value of the work of fine art is, for the purposes of this subsection (4), the value established in a written agreement between the artist and the art dealer prior to the loss or damage of the work.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 230, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 192, § 2, effective April 13.

Editor's note:

Changes in the internal numbering and lettering of subsection (1) were made on revision in 1998 to conform to standard C.R.S. format.

Cross references:

For the provisions in the "Uniform Commercial Code" concerning sales, see article 2 of title 4.

6-15-103. Penalties.

A violation by an art dealer of any of the provisions of this part 1 shall render the art dealer liable for damages to the artist in an amount equal to fifty dollars plus the actual damages sustained by the artist, including incidental and consequential damages. In such an action reasonable attorney fees and court costs shall be paid to the prevailing party.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 230, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1241), ch. 163, p. 605, § 3, effective August 9.

6-15-104. Applicability.

This part 1 shall not apply to any contract or arrangement in existence prior to March 25, 1982, nor to any extensions or renewals thereof; except that the parties to the contract or arrangement may thereafter elect to be governed by the provisions of this part 1.

Any provision, whether oral or written, in or pertaining to the placing of a work of fine art on consignment whereby any provision of this part 1 is waived shall be deemed to be against public policy and shall be void.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 230, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1241), ch. 163, p. 605, § 4, effective August 9.